Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX xN Y 56
SFX xN soudre soudre/n'q'd'l'm't's' soudre is:infi
SFX xN soudre solvant/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:ppre
SFX xN soudre sous/q' soudre is:ppas is:mas is:inv
SFX xN soudre sout/q' soudre is:ppas is:mas
SFX xN soudre souts/q' soudre is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX xN soudre soute/q' soudre is:ppas is:fem
SFX xN soudre soutes/q' soudre is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX xN soudre solu/q' résoudre is:ppas is:mas
SFX xN soudre solus/q' résoudre is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX xN soudre solue/q' résoudre is:ppas is:fem
SFX xN soudre solues/q' résoudre is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX xN soudre sous/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre is:ipre is:1sg
SFX xN soudre sous/n'q'l'm't' soudre is:ipre is:2sg
SFX xN soudre sout/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:ipre is:3sg
SFX xN soudre solvons/n'q'l't' soudre is:ipre is:1pl
SFX xN soudre solvez/n'q'l'm' soudre is:ipre is:2pl
SFX xN soudre solvent/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:ipre is:3pl
SFX xN soudre solvais/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre is:iimp is:1sg
SFX xN soudre solvais/n'q'l'm't' soudre is:iimp is:2sg
SFX xN soudre solvait/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:iimp is:3sg
SFX xN soudre solvions/n'q'l't' soudre is:iimp is:1pl
SFX xN soudre solviez/n'q'l'm' soudre is:iimp is:2pl
SFX xN soudre solvaient/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:iimp is:3pl
SFX xN soudre solus/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX xN soudre solus/n'q'l'm't' soudre is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX xN soudre solut/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX xN soudre solûmes/n'q'l't' soudre is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX xN soudre solûtes/n'q'l'm' soudre is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX xN soudre solurent/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX xN soudre soudrai/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre is:ifut is:1sg
SFX xN soudre soudras/n'q'l'm't' soudre is:ifut is:2sg
SFX xN soudre soudra/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:ifut is:3sg
SFX xN soudre soudrons/n'q'l't' soudre is:ifut is:1pl
SFX xN soudre soudrez/n'q'l'm' soudre is:ifut is:2pl
SFX xN soudre soudront/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:ifut is:3pl
SFX xN soudre soudrais/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre is:cond is:1sg
SFX xN soudre soudrais/n'q'l'm't' soudre is:cond is:2sg
SFX xN soudre soudrait/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:cond is:3sg
SFX xN soudre soudrions/n'q'l't' soudre is:cond is:1pl
SFX xN soudre soudriez/n'q'l'm' soudre is:cond is:2pl
SFX xN soudre soudraient/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:cond is:3pl
SFX xN soudre solve/n'j'l'm't' soudre is:spre is:1sg
SFX xN soudre solves/n'l'm't' soudre is:spre is:2sg
SFX xN soudre solve/n'l'm't's' soudre is:spre is:3sg
SFX xN soudre solvions/n'l't' soudre is:spre is:1pl
SFX xN soudre solviez/n'l'm' soudre is:spre is:2pl
SFX xN soudre solvent/n'l'm't's' soudre is:spre is:3pl
SFX xN soudre solusse/n'q'j'l'm't' soudre is:simp is:1sg
SFX xN soudre solusses/n'q'l'm't' soudre is:simp is:2sg
SFX xN soudre solût/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:simp is:3sg
SFX xN soudre solussions/n'q'l't' soudre is:simp is:1pl
SFX xN soudre solussiez/n'q'l'm' soudre is:simp is:2pl
SFX xN soudre solussent/n'q'l'm't's' soudre is:simp is:3pl
SFX xN soudre sous/n'l'm' soudre is:impe is:2sg
SFX xN soudre solvons/n'l' soudre is:impe is:1pl
SFX xN soudre solvez/n'l'm' soudre is:impe is:2pl
SFX xO N 51
SFX xO oudre oudre coudre is:infi
SFX xO oudre ousant coudre is:ppre
SFX xO oudre ousu coudre is:ppas is:mas
SFX xO oudre ousus coudre is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX xO oudre ousue coudre is:ppas is:fem
SFX xO oudre ousues coudre is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX xO oudre ouds coudre is:ipre is:1sg
SFX xO oudre ouds coudre is:ipre is:2sg
SFX xO oudre oud coudre is:ipre is:3sg
SFX xO oudre ousons coudre is:ipre is:1pl
SFX xO oudre ousez coudre is:ipre is:2pl
SFX xO oudre ousent coudre is:ipre is:3pl
SFX xO oudre ousais coudre is:iimp is:1sg
SFX xO oudre ousais coudre is:iimp is:2sg
SFX xO oudre ousait coudre is:iimp is:3sg
SFX xO oudre ousions coudre is:iimp is:1pl
SFX xO oudre ousiez coudre is:iimp is:2pl
SFX xO oudre ousaient coudre is:iimp is:3pl
SFX xO oudre ousis coudre is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX xO oudre ousis coudre is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX xO oudre ousit coudre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX xO oudre ousîmes coudre is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX xO oudre ousîtes coudre is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX xO oudre ousirent coudre is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX xO oudre oudrai coudre is:ifut is:1sg
SFX xO oudre oudras coudre is:ifut is:2sg
SFX xO oudre oudra coudre is:ifut is:3sg
SFX xO oudre oudrons coudre is:ifut is:1pl
SFX xO oudre oudrez coudre is:ifut is:2pl
SFX xO oudre oudront coudre is:ifut is:3pl
SFX xO oudre oudrais coudre is:cond is:1sg
SFX xO oudre oudrais coudre is:cond is:2sg
SFX xO oudre oudrait coudre is:cond is:3sg
SFX xO oudre oudrions coudre is:cond is:1pl
SFX xO oudre oudriez coudre is:cond is:2pl
SFX xO oudre oudraient coudre is:cond is:3pl
SFX xO oudre ouse coudre is:spre is:1sg
SFX xO oudre ouses coudre is:spre is:2sg
SFX xO oudre ouse coudre is:spre is:3sg
SFX xO oudre ousions coudre is:spre is:1pl
SFX xO oudre ousiez coudre is:spre is:2pl
SFX xO oudre ousent coudre is:spre is:3pl
SFX xO oudre ousisse coudre is:simp is:1sg
SFX xO oudre ousisses coudre is:simp is:2sg
SFX xO oudre ousît coudre is:simp is:3sg
SFX xO oudre ousissions coudre is:simp is:1pl
SFX xO oudre ousissiez coudre is:simp is:2pl
SFX xO oudre ousissent coudre is:simp is:3pl
SFX xO oudre ouds coudre is:impe is:2sg
SFX xO oudre ousons coudre is:impe is:1pl
SFX xO oudre ousez coudre is:impe is:2pl
SFX xP Y 51
SFX xP oudre oudre/n'q'd'l' moudre is:infi
SFX xP oudre oulant/n'q'l' moudre is:ppre
SFX xP oudre oulu/q' moudre is:ppas is:mas
SFX xP oudre oulus/q' moudre is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX xP oudre oulue/q' moudre is:ppas is:fem
SFX xP oudre oulues/q' moudre is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX xP oudre ouds/n'q'l' moudre is:ipre is:1sg
SFX xP oudre ouds/n'q'l' moudre is:ipre is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oud/n'q'l' moudre is:ipre is:3sg
SFX xP oudre oulons/n'q'l' moudre is:ipre is:1pl
SFX xP oudre oulez/n'q'l' moudre is:ipre is:2pl
SFX xP oudre oulent/n'q'l' moudre is:ipre is:3pl
SFX xP oudre oulais/n'q'l' moudre is:iimp is:1sg
SFX xP oudre oulais/n'q'l' moudre is:iimp is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oulait/n'q'l' moudre is:iimp is:3sg
SFX xP oudre oulions/n'q'l' moudre is:iimp is:1pl
SFX xP oudre ouliez/n'q'l' moudre is:iimp is:2pl
SFX xP oudre oulaient/n'q'l' moudre is:iimp is:3pl
SFX xP oudre oulus/n'q'l' moudre is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX xP oudre oulus/n'q'l' moudre is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oulut/n'q'l' moudre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX xP oudre oulûmes/n'q'l' moudre is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX xP oudre oulûtes/n'q'l' moudre is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX xP oudre oulurent/n'q'l' moudre is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX xP oudre oudrai/n'q'l' moudre is:ifut is:1sg
SFX xP oudre oudras/n'q'l' moudre is:ifut is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oudra/n'q'l' moudre is:ifut is:3sg
SFX xP oudre oudrons/n'q'l' moudre is:ifut is:1pl
SFX xP oudre oudrez/n'q'l' moudre is:ifut is:2pl
SFX xP oudre oudront/n'q'l' moudre is:ifut is:3pl
SFX xP oudre oudrais/n'q'l' moudre is:cond is:1sg
SFX xP oudre oudrais/n'q'l' moudre is:cond is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oudrait/n'q'l' moudre is:cond is:3sg
SFX xP oudre oudrions/n'q'l' moudre is:cond is:1pl
SFX xP oudre oudriez/n'q'l' moudre is:cond is:2pl
SFX xP oudre oudraient/n'q'l' moudre is:cond is:3pl
SFX xP oudre oule/n'q'l' moudre is:spre is:1sg
SFX xP oudre oules/n'q'l' moudre is:spre is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oule/n'q'l' moudre is:spre is:3sg
SFX xP oudre oulions/n'q'l' moudre is:spre is:1pl
SFX xP oudre ouliez/n'q'l' moudre is:spre is:2pl
SFX xP oudre oulent/n'q'l' moudre is:spre is:3pl
SFX xP oudre oulusse/n'q'l' moudre is:simp is:1sg
SFX xP oudre oulusses/n'q'l' moudre is:simp is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oulût/n'q'l' moudre is:simp is:3sg
SFX xP oudre oulussions/n'q'l' moudre is:simp is:1pl
SFX xP oudre oulussiez/n'q'l' moudre is:simp is:2pl
SFX xP oudre oulussent/n'q'l' moudre is:simp is:3pl
SFX xP oudre ouds/n'l'm' moudre is:impe is:2sg
SFX xP oudre oulons/n'l' moudre is:impe is:1pl
SFX xP oudre oulez/n'l'm' moudre is:impe is:2pl
