Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
absoudre/xN() po:v3tp
coudre/xO() po:v3t
découdre/xO() po:v3tp
dissoudre/xN() po:v3tp
émoudre/xP() po:v3t
moudre/xP() po:v3t
recoudre/xO() po:v3tp
remoudre/xP() po:v3t
résoudre/xN() po:v3tp
